District of Columbia statutes.
46-702

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 285, Pub. L. 85-94, § 2
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 159(f)(1)
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(f)(1), 33 DCR 6710
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748
1981 Ed., § 30-302.
1973 Ed., § 30-302.